Hawaii, session 2025, SB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State recognizes the increasing threat of wildfires to our communities, natural resources, and economy, and that the State is committed to proactively addressing this growing challenge through a comprehensive and collaborative approach. Understanding the need for a multifaceted strategy, the legislature further finds that a working group comprised of government agencies, fire experts, economists, legal experts, industry leaders, large landowners, and stakeholders is required to find solutions that address the State's wildfire preparedness and mitigation challenges and increase the State's wildfire preparedness and mitigation practices. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a wildfire mitigation working group. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established a wildfire mitigation working group to: (1)  Develop a system of state tax incentives, penalties, and state-level funding support for managing land to adequately reduce fire risk; (2)  Chart a plan for retrofitting unsafely designed subdivisions to have adequate evacuation routes; (3)  Chart the State's course to increase workforce development in land management and wildfire mitigation sectors; (4)  Work with industry leaders and unions to improve ignition-resistant building strategies that are both safe and cost-effective; (5)  Integrate food security and climate resilience initiatives with wildfire prevention, safety, and resilience work; and (6)  Identify funding sources and launch a state-level competitive grant funding opportunity to support fuels management on private lands. (b) The working group shall be comprised of the following members: (1)  The state fire marshal, who shall serve as co-chair; (2)  The director of the office of planning and sustainable development, who shall serve as co-chair; (3)  The chair of the house of representatives standing committee on water and land; (4)  The chair of the senate standing committee on water and land; (5)  The chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or their designee; (6)  The chairperson of the board of land and natural resources or their designee; (7)  The director of transportation or their designee; (8)  The director of taxation or their designee; (9)  The airports rescue fire chief from the airports division of the department of transportation; (10)  A representative from the land division of the department of land and natural resources; (11)  A fire protection forester from the wildfire management branch of the division of forestry and wildlife within the department of land natural resources; (12)  The fire chief of each county; (13)  An economist from the university of Hawaii economic research organization, to be selected by the executive director of the university of Hawaii economic research organization; (14)  An economist from the university of Hawaii at Manoa, to be selected by the president of the university of Hawaii at Manoa; (15)  An economist from the university of Hawaii at Hilo, to be selected by the chancellor of the university of Hawaii at Hilo; (16)  A wildfire expert from each county, to be invited by the state fire marshal; (17)  A representative of the ranching industry, to be invited by the state fire marshal; (18)  A representative of the Hawaii wildfire management organization, to be invited by the chairperson of the state fire marshal; (19)  A representative of the public, to be invited by the speaker of the house of representatives; and (20)  A representative of the public, to be invited by the president of the senate. (c) No member of the working group shall be subject to chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, solely because of that member's participation on the working group. (d) The office of planning and sustainable development shall provide administrative support as required by the working group. (e) The working group shall submit a complete report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the administrative expenses of the wildfire mitigation working group established by section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of planning and sustainable development for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________